Washington statutes.
RCW 18.08.390

Registration of prior registrants.

All persons registered as architects under chapter 205, Laws of 1919, or registered as architects under chapter 323, Laws of 1959, as amended, before July 28, 1985, shall be registered as architects without examination.

[ 1985 c 37 s 10.]